District of Columbia statutes.
29-1014.02

Member approval of other disposition of assets.

A sale, lease, exchange, license, or other disposition of assets of a limited cooperative association, other than a disposition described in § 29-1014.01, shall require approval of the association’s members under §§ 29-1014.03 and 29-1014.04 if the disposition leaves the association without significant continuing business activity.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1014.01, § 29-1014.03, and § 29-1014.04.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1502 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.